src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON OKTAF   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                                 num-ordinal-1 ;
            oktalohki:okºta      OKTALOHKI     ;
 oktalohki+Num+Sg+Nom:akta#lohki K             ;
! K ; this lead to "go +Clt" as an analysis, and was removed.
! Thus, direction to K should be made at an earlier point


LEXICON 2TO9F   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                                                         num-ordinal-2to9  ; ! also ordinals of complex numbers
                                        guokte:guokºt    GUOKTE            ;
                                      guovttis:guo       GUOVTTIS_N        ;
                                        golbma           GOLBMA            ;
                golbma+Num+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth-a-á:golbmá    K                 ;
                golbma+Num+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-a-á:golbmá    K                 ;
                golbma+Num+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-a-á:golmmá    K                 ;
                golbma+Num+Sg+Com+Err/Orth-a-á:golmmáin  K                 ;
                                       golmmas:golbmas   OVCCIS_N          ;
                                      njeallje:njeallj   GUOKTE            ;
                           njeallja+Num+Sg+Nom:njeallja  K                 ;
                           njeallja+Num+Sg+Gen:njealja   K                 ;
                  njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:njeallji  K                 ;
                  njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:njealjji  K                 ;
                  njeallje+Num+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:njealjje  K                 ;
                           njeallja+Num+Sg+Acc:njealja   K                 ;
                                      njealjis:njealljis OVCCIS_N          ;
        njealjis+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Err/Orth:njealjis  GAHPIR_CGforms    ;
 njealjis+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:njealljis K                 ;
                                        vihtta:vi        VIHTTA            ;
                vihtta+Num+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth-a-á:vihttá    K                 ;
                    vihtta+Num+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:vihta     K                 ;
                                         viđas:vi        VIDAS_N           ;
                                        guhtta:gu        VIHTTA            ;
                guhtta+Num+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-a-á:guhttá    K                 ;
                guhtta+Num+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth-a-á:guhttá    K                 ;
                                         guđas:gu        VIDAS_N           ;
                                         čieža:či        CIEZA             ;
                                         gieža:gi        CIEZA             ;
                                        čiežas:čiehºčas  OVCCIS_N          ;
                                        giežas:giehºčas  OVCCIS_N          ;
                                        gávcci:gákºci    GAVCCI            ;
                    gávcci+Num+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:gávccii   K                 ;
                               gávcci+Err/Orth:gákºce    NumSTEMVOWELforms ;
                                       gávccis:gákºcis   OVCCIS_N          ;
                                         ovcci:okºci     GAVCCI            ;
                                ovcci+Err/Orth:okºce     NumSTEMVOWELforms ;
                                        ovccis:okºcis    OVCCIS_N          ;


LEXICON BARELOGIF   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
             logi:                     LOGI     ;
      logát+A+Ord:logád                VUOSTTAS ;
            logis:lohºkis              OVCCIS_N ;
       máŋgalogis:máŋga#lohºkis        OVCCIS_N ;
 guoktenuppelogis:guokte#nuppe#lohºkis OVCCIS_N ;
   oktanuppelogis:okta#nuppe#lohºkis   OVCCIS_N ;

LEXICON LOHKI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 lohki+Num+Sg+Nom:lohki K ;


LEXICON 2TO9LOG   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
              guoktelogi:guokºt        GUOKTELOGI ;
              golbmalogi:golbma        GOLBMALOGI ;
            njealljelogi:njeallj       GUOKTELOGI ;
 njealljalogi+Num+Sg+Nom:njeallja#logi K          ;
 njealljalogi+Num+Sg+Acc:njeallja#logi K          ;
 njealljalogi+Num+Sg+Gen:njealja#logi  K          ;
              vihttalogi:vi            VIHTTALOGI ;
              guhttalogi:gu            VIHTTALOGI ;
               čiežalogi:či            CIEZALOGI  ;
               giežalogi:gi            CIEZALOGI  ;
              gávccilogi:gákºci        GAVCCILOGI ;
               gákcilogi:gákci         GAVCCILOGI ;
               ovccilogi:okºci         GAVCCILOGI ;
              nubbelohki:nubb          NUBBELOGI  ;
                   nubbe:nubbe#        LOHKAI-END ;
                  guokte:guokte#       LOHKAI-END ;
                  golbma:golbma#       LOHKAI-END ;
                njeallje:njeallje#     LOHKAI-END ;
                njeallja:njeallja#     LOHKAI-END ;
                  vihtta:vihtta#       LOHKAI-END ;
                  guhtta:guhtta#       LOHKAI-END ;
                   čieža:čieža#        LOHKAI-END ;
                   gieža:gieža#        LOHKAI-END ;
                  gávcci:gávcci#       LOHKAI-END ;
                   ovcci:ovcci#        LOHKAI-END ;


LEXICON 2TO9CUO   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   guokte:guokte#   GCUODI ;
   golbma:golbma#   GCUODI ;
 njeallje:njeallje# GCUODI ;
 njeallja:njeallja# GCUODI ;
   vihtta:vihtta#   GCUODI ;
   guhtta:guhtta#   GCUODI ;
    čieža:čieža#    GCUODI ;
    gieža:gieža#    GCUODI ;
   gávcci:gávcci#   GCUODI ;
    ovcci:ovcci#    GCUODI ;

LEXICON GCUODI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
             čuođi:čuođi#         LOGIF      ;
   čuođiguoktelogi:čuođi#guokºt   GUOKTELOGI ;
   čuođigolbmalogi:čuođi#golbma   GOLBMALOGI ;
 čuođinjealljelogi:čuođi#njeallj  GUOKTELOGI ;
   čuođivihttalogi:čuođi#vi       VIHTTALOGI ;
   čuođiguhttalogi:čuođi#gu       VIHTTALOGI ;
    čuođičiežalogi:čuođi#či       CIEZALOGI  ;
    čuođigiežalogi:čuođi#gi       CIEZALOGI  ;
   čuođigávccilogi:čuođi#gákºci   GAVCCILOGI ;
    čuođiovccilogi:čuođi#okºci    GAVCCILOGI ;
       čuođiguokte:čuođiguokte#   LOHKAI-END ;
       čuođigolbma:čuođigolbma#   LOHKAI-END ;
     čuođinjeallje:čuođinjeallje# LOHKAI-END ;
       čuođivihtta:čuođivihtta#   LOHKAI-END ;
       čuođiguhtta:čuođiguhtta#   LOHKAI-END ;
        čuođičieža:čuođičieža#    LOHKAI-END ;
        čuođigieža:čuođigieža#    LOHKAI-END ;
       čuođigávcci:čuođigávcci#   LOHKAI-END ;
        čuođiovcci:čuođiovcci#    LOHKAI-END ;
             čuođi:čuođi#         OKTAF      ;
             čuođi:čuođi#         ONLY_CMP   ;
             čuođi:čuođi#         2TO9F      ;
      čuođát+A+Ord:čuođád         VUOSTTAS   ;
             čuođi:čuođi#         21TO99     ;
             čuođi:čuođi#         111TO119   ;
             čuođi:čuođi#         LOHKI      ;


LEXICON 1TO9CUODI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 oktačuohti+Num+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:akta#čuohti    K           ;
                   oktačuohti:okºta          OKTACUOHTI  ;
                  guoktečuođi:guokºt         GUOKTECUODI ;
                  nubbečuohti:nubb           NUBBECUOHTI ;
                  golbmačuođi:golbma         GOLBMACUODI ;
                njeallječuođi:njeallj        GUOKTECUODI ;
     njealljačuođi+Num+Sg+Nom:njeallja#čuođi K           ;
     njealljačuođi+Num+Sg+Acc:njeallja#čuođi K           ;
     njealljačuođi+Num+Sg+Gen:njealja#čuođi  K           ;
                  vihttačuođi:vi             VIHTTACUODI ;
                  guhttačuođi:gu             VIHTTACUODI ;
                   čiežačuođi:či             CIEZACUODI  ;
                   giežačuođi:gi             CIEZACUODI  ;
                  gávccičuođi:gákºci         GAVCCICUODI ;
                   ovccičuođi:okºci          GAVCCICUODI ;

LEXICON NLX   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
    nuppelohkái:nuppe#lohkái#    2TO9CUO ;
       nuppelot:nuppe#lot#       2TO9CUO ;
       nuppelot:nuppe#loh9#      2TO9CUO ;
 goalmmátlohkái:goalmmát#lohkái# 2TO9CUO ;
    goalmmátlot:goalmmát#lot#    2TO9CUO ;
    goalmmátlot:goalmmát#loh9#   2TO9CUO ;
 njealjátlohkái:njealját#lohkái# 2TO9CUO ;
    njealjátlot:njealját#lot#    2TO9CUO ;
    njealjátlot:njealját#loh9#   2TO9CUO ;
    viđátlohkái:viđát#lohkái#    2TO9CUO ;
       viđátlot:viđát#lot#       2TO9CUO ;
       viđátlot:viđát#loh9#      2TO9CUO ;
    guđátlohkái:guđát#lohkái#    2TO9CUO ;
       guđátlot:guđát#lot#       2TO9CUO ;
       guđátlot:guđát#loh9#      2TO9CUO ;
    viđatlohkái:viđat#lohkái#    2TO9CUO ;
       viđatlot:viđat#lot#       2TO9CUO ;
       viđatlot:viđat#loh9#      2TO9CUO ;
    guđatlohkái:guđat#lohkái#    2TO9CUO ;
       guđatlot:guđat#lot#       2TO9CUO ;
       guđatlot:guđat#loh9#      2TO9CUO ;
  čihččetlohkái:čihččet#lohkái#  2TO9CUO ;
     čihččetlot:čihččet#lot#     2TO9CUO ;
     čihččetlot:čihččet#loh9#    2TO9CUO ;
  gávccátlohkái:gávccát#lohkái#  2TO9CUO ;
     gávccátlot:gávccát#lot#     2TO9CUO ;
     gávccátlot:gávccát#loh9#    2TO9CUO ;
   ovccátlohkái:ovccát#lohkái#   2TO9CUO ;
      ovccátlot:ovccát#lot#      2TO9CUO ;
      ovccátlot:ovccát#loh9#     2TO9CUO ;
    logátlohkái:logát#lohkái#    2TO9CUO ;
       logátlot:logát#lot#       2TO9CUO ;
       logátlot:logát#loh9#      2TO9CUO ;
LEXICON CUODI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                        čuođi:čuođi#                OKTAF            ;
                        čuođi:čuođi#                2TO9F            ;
                        čuođi:čuođi#                LOHKI            ;
                   oktačuohti:okta#čuohti#          OKTAF            ;
                   oktačuohti:okta#čuohti#          2TO9F            ;
                   oktačuohti:okta#čuohti#          LOHKI            ;
                       čuohti:čuohti#               OKTAF            ;
                       čuohti:čuohti#               2TO9F            ;
                       čuohti:čuohti#               LOHKI            ;
